Utah statutes.
54-4-1.   General jurisdiction.

The commission is hereby vested with power and jurisdiction to supervise and regulate every public utility in this state, and to supervise all of the business of every such public utility in this state, and to do all things, whether herein specifically designated or in addition thereto, which are necessary or convenient in the exercise of such power and jurisdiction; provided, however, that the Department of Transportation shall have jurisdiction over those safety functions transferred to it by the Department of Transportation Act.

